Hawaii statutes.
PART X.
CRIMES

§844D-111 Refusal or failure to provide
specimen for forensic identification. (a) A person commits the offense of
refusal or failure to provide specimen for forensic identification if the
person is required by this chapter to provide any blood specimens, buccal swab
samples, or print impressions and intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly,
refuses or fails to provide any of the required blood specimens, buccal swab
samples, or print impressions after the person has received written notice from
the department, the department of public safety, any law enforcement personnel,
or officer of the court that the person is required to provide each and every
one of the blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and print impressions required
by this chapter.

(b) A person who intentionally or knowingly
fails to comply with this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. A person
who recklessly fails to comply with this section shall be guilty of a petty
misdemeanor.

(c) For purposes of this section, "intentionally",
"knowingly", and "recklessly" shall have the same meanings
as in section 702-206. [L 2005, c 112, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 144, §3; am L
2015, c 193, §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next